src/morphology/stems/wordToNumeral.lexc
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2 
! or any later version.

LEXICON wordToNumeral
HUNDREDSM ;		     ! 200M
сё:1 HUNDREDM ; ! 100M
TENSM ;		         ! 20-99M
TEENSM ;	         ! 10-19M
1MILJON ;            ! 1M
ONESM ;		         ! 1-9M
1GIGA ;            	 ! 1G
ONESG ;		         ! 1-9G
HUNDREDST ;	         ! 200000-999999
сё:1 HUNDREDT ; ! 100000-100999
TENST ;			     ! 20000-99999,10000-10999
TEENST ;		     ! 11000-19999
ONEST ;			     ! 2000-9999
сюрс:1 THOUSAND ; ! 1000-1999

UNDERTHOUSAND ;		 ! 100-999
TENS ;			     ! 20-99
TEENS ;			     ! 10-19
ONES ;			     ! 1-9

LEXICON ONESG
ӧти% :   1GIGA ;

кык:2    GIGA ;
куим:3  GIGA ;
нёль:4 GIGA ;

вит:5  GIGA ;
квайт:6  GIGA ;
сизим:7  GIGA ;


кӧкъямыс:8  GIGA ;
ӧкмыс:9   GIGA ; 

LEXICON 1GIGA
милярд% :1 OVERMILLIONS ;

LEXICON GIGA
% милярд% : OVERMILLIONS ;

LEXICON HUNDREDSM

кык:2    CUODIM ;
куим:3  CUODIM ;
нёль:4 CUODIM ;

вит:5  CUODIM ;
квайт:6  CUODIM ;
сизим:7  CUODIM ;


кӧкъямыс:8  CUODIM ;
ӧкмыс:9   CUODIM ;

LEXICON CUODIM
сё: HUNDREDM ; !200, not 100

LEXICON HUNDREDM
      TENSM ;
      TEENSM ;
:%0   ONESM ;
:%0%0 MILJON ;

LEXICON TEENSM
:1 TEENM ;

LEXICON TEENM
ӧти:1     LOHKAIM ;

кык:2     LOHKAIM ;
куим:3   LOHKAIM ;
нёль:4  LOHKAIM ;

вит:5   LOHKAIM ;
квайт:6   LOHKAIM ;
сизим:7   LOHKAIM ;


кӧкъямыс:8   LOHKAIM ;
ӧкмыс:9    LOHKAIM ;

LEXICON LOHKAIM
дас: MILJON ;

LEXICON TENSM
дас:1%0 MILJON ;

кык:2    LÅGEVM ;
куим:3  LÅGEVM ;
нёль:4 LÅGEVM ;

вит:5  LÅGEVM ;
квайт:6  LÅGEVM ;
сизим:7  LÅGEVM ;


кӧкъямыс:8  LÅGEVM ;
ӧкмыс:9   LÅGEVM ;

LEXICON LÅGEVM
дас:%0 MILJON ;
дас:     ONESM ;

LEXICON ONESM
ӧти% :   1MILJON ;

кык:2    MILJON ;
куим:3  MILJON ;
нёль:4 MILJON ;

вит:5  MILJON ;
квайт:6  MILJON ;
сизим:7  MILJON ;


кӧкъямыс:8  MILJON ;
ӧкмыс:9   MILJON ; 

LEXICON 1MILJON
миллион% :1 OVERTHOUSANDS ;
миллион% :1  OVERTHOUSANDS ;

LEXICON MILJON
% милюн% : OVERTHOUSANDS ;

! =================
! Under the million
! =================

LEXICON OVERMILLIONS
                    HUNDREDSM ;
сё:1           HUNDREDM ;
:%0                 TENSM ;
:%0                 TEENSM ;
:%0%0               1MILJON ;
:%0%0               ONESM ;
:%0%0%0             HUNDREDST ;		        ! x00.000.000
сё:%0%0%01     HUNDREDT ;    ! 100.000.000
:%0%0%0%0           TENST ;		        !  20.000.000
:%0%0%0%0           TEENST ;		    !  10.000.000
:%0%0%0%0%0         ONEST ;		    !   2.000.000
сюрс:%0%0%0%0%01  THOUSAND ;	!   1.000.000
:%0%0%0%0%0%0       UNDERTHOUSAND ;	
:%0%0%0%0%0%0%0     TENS ;
:%0%0%0%0%0%0%0     TEENS ;
:%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0   ONES ;
:%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 COMMA ;	     !  x000000

LEXICON OVERTHOUSANDS
HUNDREDST ;		        ! x00.000.000
сё:1 HUNDREDT ;    ! 100.000.000
:%0 TENST ;		        !  20.000.000
:%0 TEENST ;		    !  10.000.000
:%0%0 ONEST ;		    !   2.000.000
сюрс:%0%01 THOUSAND ;	!   1.000.000
:%0%0%0 UNDERTHOUSAND ;	
:%0%0%0%0 TENS ;
:%0%0%0%0 TEENS ;
:%0%0%0%0%0 ONES ;
:%0%0%0%0%0%0 COMMA ;	     !  x000000

LEXICON HUNDREDST

кык:2    CUODIT ;
куим:3  CUODIT ;	! 300000-399999
нёль:4 CUODIT ;	! 400000-499999

вит:5  CUODIT ;	! 500000-599999
квайт:6  CUODIT ;	! 600000-699999
сизим:7  CUODIT ;


кӧкъямыс:8  CUODIT ;	! 800000-899999
ӧкмыс:9   CUODIT ;	! 900000-999999

LEXICON CUODIT
сё: HUNDREDT ;	! 200000-199999

LEXICON HUNDREDT	     ! X = 1-9, Y = 0-9
TENST ;			     ! X2XYYY, X10YYY
TEENST ;		     ! X1XYYY
ӧти:%01 THOUSANDS ;
:%0 ONEST ;		     ! XX0YYY
:%0%0 THOUSANDS ;	 ! X00YYY

LEXICON TEENST
:1 TEENT ;

LEXICON TEENT
дас:%0 THOUSANDS ;
ӧти:1 LOHKAIT ;

кык:2 LOHKAIT ;
куим:3 LOHKAIT ;
нёль:4 LOHKAIT ;

вит:5 LOHKAIT ;
квайт:6 LOHKAIT ;
сизим:7 LOHKAIT ;


кӧкъямыс:8 LOHKAIT ;
ӧкмыс:9 LOHKAIT ;

LEXICON LOHKAIT
дас: THOUSANDS ;

LEXICON TENST

кык:2 LÅGEVT ;
куим:3 LÅGEVT ;
нёль:4 LÅGEVT ;

вит:5 LÅGEVT ;
квайт:6 LÅGEVT ;
сизим:7 LÅGEVT ;


кӧкъямыс:8 LÅGEVT ;
ӧкмыс:9 LÅGEVT ;

LEXICON LÅGEVT
дас:%0 THOUSANDS ;
дас#ӧти#сюрс:1 THOUSAND ;
дас: ONEST ;

LEXICON ONEST

кык:2 THOUSANDS ;
куим:3 THOUSANDS ;
нёль:4 THOUSANDS ;

вит:5 THOUSANDS ;
квайт:6 THOUSANDS ;
сизим:7 THOUSANDS ;


кӧкъямыс:8 THOUSANDS ;
ӧкмыс:9 THOUSANDS ;

LEXICON THOUSANDS      ! x > 1
сюрс: THOUSAND ;


LEXICON THOUSAND
UNDERTHOUSAND ;	   ! 1100-1999
:%0 TENS ;	   ! 1020-1099
:%0 TEENS ;	   ! 1010-1019
:%0%0 ONES ;	   ! 1001-1009
:%0%0%0 COMMA ;	   ! 1000

!===========================
!Here starts the 999 numbers
!===========================

LEXICON UNDERTHOUSAND
HUNDREDS ;
сё:1 HUNDRED ;

tjuodát:1 CUODAAT ;

LEXICON HUNDREDS

кык:2 CUODI ;
куим:3 CUODI ;
нёль:4 CUODI ;

вит:5 CUODI ;
квайт:6 CUODI ;
сизим:7 CUODI ;


кӧкъямыс:8 CUODI ;
ӧкмыс:9 CUODI ;

LEXICON CUODI
сё: HUNDRED ;

tjuodát: CUODAAT ;

LEXICON HUNDRED
TENS ;
TEENS ;
:%0 ONES ;
:%0%0 COMMA ;

LEXICON CUODAAT
:%0%0%.    COMMA ;


LEXICON TEENS
:1 TEEN ;
%дас:1 TEEN2 ;

LEXICON TEEN
ӧти:1 LOHKAI ;

кык:2 LOHKAI ;
куим:3 LOHKAI ;
нёль:4 LOHKAI ;

вит:5 LOHKAI ;
квайт:6 LOHKAI ;
сизим:7 LOHKAI ;


кӧкъямыс:8 LOHKAI ;
ӧкмыс:9 LOHKAI ;

LEXICON TEEN2
ӧти:1 COMMA ;

кык:2 COMMA ;
куим:3 COMMA ;
нёль:4 COMMA ;

вит:5 COMMA ;
квайт:6 COMMA ;
сизим:7 COMMA ;


кӧкъямыс:8 COMMA ;
ӧкмыс:9 COMMA ;

LEXICON LOHKAI
дас: COMMA ;
:%.      LOGAAT ;

LEXICON LOGAAT
lågåt: COMMA ;


LEXICON TENS
дас:1%0 COMMA ;
дасde:1%0%. COMMA ; ! sma, correct this

кык:2 LÅGEV ;
куим:3 LÅGEV ;
нёль:4 LÅGEV ;

вит:5 LÅGEV ;
квайт:6 LÅGEV ;
сизим:7 LÅGEV ;


кӧкъямыс:8 LÅGEV ;
ӧкмыс:9 LÅGEV ;

LEXICON LÅGEV
дас:%0 COMMA ;
дас:%0 COMMA ;
дас: ONES ;


LEXICON ONES
CARDINAL ;
ORDINAL ;

LEXICON CARDINAL
ӧти:1    COMMA ;

кык:2    COMMA ;
куим:3  COMMA ;
нёль:4 COMMA ;

вит:5  COMMA ;
квайт:6  COMMA ;
сизим:7  COMMA ;

кӧкъямыс:8  COMMA ;
ӧкмыс:9   COMMA ;

LEXICON ORDINAL
vuosttasj:1%.     COMMA ;
nuppát:2%.   COMMA ;
goalmát:3%.   COMMA ;
nælját:4%. COMMA ;
viđát:5%.   COMMA ;
gudát:6%.   COMMA ;
giehttjit:7%.    COMMA ;
gávtsát:8%.   COMMA ;
avtsát:9%.    COMMA ;

LEXICON COMMA
 ENDLEX ;
 COMMASECTION ;

LEXICON COMMASECTION  ! these are not spellchecked!!!
                  ENDLEX ;
! % komma% :,      Root ;
! % tjuohkkis% :%. Root ;
! % kolon% :%:     Root ;
! % sárggis% :%-   Root ; 
 % la% :%=         Root ; 
 % gráda% :%°      Root ; 
 % paragráfa% :§   Root ; 
! % násti% :%*     Root ; 
 % ja% :&          Root ; 

LEXICON ENDLEX
 # ;
